Utah statutes.
26-21-21.   Authentication of medical records.

Any entry in a medical record compiled or maintained by a health care facility may be authenticated by identifying the author of the entry by:

(1)  a signature including first initial, last name, and discipline; or

(2)  the use of a computer identification process unique to the author that definitively identifies the author.



Enacted by Chapter 31, 1992 General Session

